South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3859.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Prohibition on Support for the World Health Organization Section 1-1-1910. No state-funded agency, department, university, or public institution shall allocate funding, resources, or any form of support to the World Health Organization or any affiliated programs, policies, or initiatives. SECTION 2. (A) All state-funded entities currently implementing policies, guidelines, or initiatives derived from or associated with the World Health Organization shall immediately terminate such practices and policies. (B) Each state-funded agency and university shall conduct a comprehensive review of their policies and budgets to identify and eliminate any connections, direct or indirect, with the World Health Organization. (C) All state-funded entities shall submit a report to the General Assembly detailing compliance with this act within ninety days of the act taking effect. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----